Massachusetts, session 194th, H186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended after Section 24I by 
inserting the following new section:- 
“Section 24I½. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Marijuana”, the term “marijuana” or “marihuana” as defined in section 1 of chapter 
94G. 
“Edibles”, baked goods, candies, drinks, or other food items that contain marijuana, the 
drug cannabis, THC, or THC oils. 

of 3 9  “Opened container of marijuana” any marijuana or marijuana product, including but not 
limited to edibles, in which the original packaging has been opened or the original seal broken 
and/or any edible that has been obviously altered from its original state. Marijuana and marijuana 
products, including but not limited to edibles, that are not manufactured by a licensed facility are 
considered open regardless of packaging. 
'”Passenger area”, the area designed to seat the driver and passengers while the motor 
vehicle is in operation and any area that is readily accessible to the driver or a passenger while in 
a seated position including, but not limited to, the glove compartment; provided, however, that 
the passenger area shall not include a motor vehicle’s trunk or a locked glove compartment or, if 
a motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk, the area behind the last upright seat or an area not 
normally occupied by the driver or passenger. 
(b) No person shall, upon any way or in any place to which the public has a right of 
access, or upon any way or in any place to which members of the public have access as invitees 
or licensees, possess an open container of marijuana or marijuana products in the passenger area 
of any motor vehicle. A person who violates this subsection shall be punished by a civil penalty 
of not less than $100 or more than $500. 
(c) This section shall not apply to: (1) the passengers of a motor vehicle designed, 
maintained and used for the transportation of persons for compensation so long as the driver is 
separated from the passengers in such a way that they will not be affected by any activities 
involving prepared paraphernalia or opened edibles, and (2) the living quarters of a house coach 
or house trailer.” 

of 3 30  SECTION 2. Section 13 of Chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out subsection (d).